Alaska, session 34, SB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 30 is amended by adding a new chapter to read: 04 Chapter 35. Marine Fuel. 05 Sec. 30.35.010. Marine fuel in coastal waters. Except as provided in this 06 chapter, a person may not use marine fuel in an auxiliary engine or main engine on a 07 vessel operating within applicable waters if the marine fuel exceeds a maximum sulfur 08 content of 09 (1) 0.1 percent sulfur by weight while the vessel is operating within the 10 emission control area; or 11 (2) 0.5 percent sulfur by weight while the vessel is operating outside 12 the emission control area. 13 Sec. 30.35.020. Exemptions. (a) A person operating a vessel is exempt from 14 the marine fuel requirements in this chapter during an ocean-going voyage that 15 consists of continuous and expeditious navigation through applicable waters for the 01 purpose of traversing the applicable waters without calling at two or more ports, 02 roadsteads, or terminal facilities in the state. In this subsection, "continuous and 03 expeditious navigation" includes stopping and anchoring only if stopping and 04 anchoring are required by the United States Coast Guard, rendered necessary by force 05 majeure or distress, or made for the purpose of rendering assistance to a person, 06 vessel, or aircraft in danger or distress. 07 (b) A person operating a vessel is exempt from the marine fuel requirements 08 in this chapter if the person intends the vessel to call at one port, roadstead, or terminal 09 facility in the state, but the vessel calls on a second port, roadstead, or terminal facility 10 in the state because of force majeure, distress, or for the purpose of rendering 11 assistance to a person, vessel, or aircraft in danger or distress. 12 (c) A person operating a vessel owned or operated by the United States or a 13 foreign government is exempt from this chapter. 14 (d) The Department of Environmental Conservation may exempt a person 15 operating a vessel from this chapter if the person operates the vessel in a manner that 16 results in a total sulfur output to the environment that is less than or equivalent to the 17 total sulfur output that would result from operating the vessel with a marine fuel that 18 does not exceed a maximum sulfur content of 0.1 percent sulfur by weight. 19 Sec. 30.35.030. Definitions. In this chapter, 20 (1) "applicable waters" has the meaning given to "applicable waters of 21 Alaska" in 33 CFR 159.305; 22 (2) "emission control area" means the North American Emission 23 Control Area established under the International Convention for the Prevention of 24 Pollution from Ships, 1973, Annex VI; 25 (3) "marine fuel" means a distillate fuel or residual fuel used for 26 combustion purposes for propulsion or operation on board a vessel; "marine fuel" does 27 not include natural gas, propane, ethanol, methanol, hydrogen, electricity, fuel cells, or 28 a mixture that contains only natural gas, propane, ethanol, methanol, or hydrogen; 29 (4) "roadstead" means a facility that is used for the loading, unloading, 30 and anchoring of vessels; 31 (5) "vessel" has the meaning given in AS 30.30.170. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.